Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Chapter 26. Rights of State Employees.

Administrative Code. —

For appearance of officers on duty, see 13 AAC 65.

Sec. 39.26.010.
State employees protected against certain conduct.

A department, agency, official, officer, or person employed by the state may not directly or indirectly

require or coerce any employee of the state to participate in any way in any activity or undertaking unless the activity or undertaking is related to the performance of official duties;

require or coerce any employee of the state to make any report concerning any of the employee’s activities or undertakings unless the activity or undertaking is related to the performance of the employee’s official duties;

except as directly related to the performance of the employee’s official duties, require or coerce any employee of the state to submit to any interrogation or examination or psychological test which is designed to elicit information concerning

the employee’s personal relationship with any person connected by blood or marriage;

the employee’s religious beliefs or practices;

sexual matters;

the employee’s political affiliation or philosophy;

coerce any employee of the state to invest or contribute earnings in any manner or for any purpose;

restrict or attempt to restrict after-working-hour statements, pronouncements or other activities, not otherwise prohibited by law or personnel rule, of any employee of the state, if the employee does not purport to speak or act in an official capacity.

The heads of the administrative departments of the state may adopt internal management regulations for their respective departments, specifying exceptions to (a)(5) of this section. These regulations shall be submitted for approval to the personnel board provided for in AS

39.25.060

.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not diminish the authority of an authorized law enforcement agency to conduct criminal investigations of state employees suspected of being involved in criminal activity.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1971)

Collateral references. —

Discharge on ground of political views or conduct as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 29 ALR4th 287.

Validity of statutes restricting political activities of public officers or employees, 51 ALR4th 702.

Sec. 39.26.015.
Required regulations for dress codes and appearance standards.

Dress codes and appearance standards adopted by a department, division, agency, official, or other employee of the state, that are to be applied to state employees shall be in the form of a regulation subject to legislative review under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 13 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For appearance, see 13 AAC 65.

For operations, see 22 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 39.26.020.
Application of chapter.

This chapter applies to those state employees in the classified and partially exempt services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 13 SLA 1976)